Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,147.01
Taxes, interest, and penalties; disposition.

All taxes, interest, and penalties collected under Chapter 66, article 4, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund or Highway Cash Fund as appropriate.

Laws 2000, LB 1067, § 6.